Washington statutes.
RCW 18.350.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Close supervision" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.260.010.

(2) "Commission" means the dental quality assurance commission established in RCW 18.32.0351.

(3) "Department" means the department of health.

(4) "Direct visual supervision" means supervision by an oral and maxillofacial surgeon or dental anesthesiologist by verbal command and under direct line of sight.

(5) "Oral and maxillofacial surgeon" has the same meaning as in RCW 18.32.020.

(6) "Secretary" means [the] secretary of health.

[ 2012 c 23 s 1.]